Illinois, session 104th, HB5418.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Unauthorized Use of Email Act. 6    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act, "public 7employer" means the State, an agency or department thereof, 8unit of local government, school district, instrumentality or 9political subdivision. 10    Section 10. Unauthorized use of email. If a public 11employer is made aware that the public employer's email system 12was used in an unauthorized manner, the public employer shall 13release a statement of admonishment to all of its employees 14affected by the unauthorized use.